Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 4. Definitions.

Sec. 11.71.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise,

“administer” means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means into the body of a patient or research subject by

a practitioner or, in the practitioner’s presence, by the practitioner’s authorized agent; or

the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of a practitioner;

“agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser, but does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseman, or employee of the carrier or warehouseman;

“cannabidiol oil” means the viscous liquid concentrate of cannabidiol extracted from the plant (genus) Cannabis containing not more than 0.3 percent delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol;

“committee” means the Controlled Substances Advisory Committee established in AS

11.71.100

;

“controlled substance” means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in the schedules set out in AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

or included in those schedules by an emergency regulation adopted under AS

11.71.125

;

“counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number, or device of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other than the person or persons who in fact manufactured, distributed, or dispensed the substance and which falsely purports or is represented to be the product of, or to have been distributed by, the other manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser;

“deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of a controlled substance whether or not there is an agency relationship;

“dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research subject by or under the lawful order of a practitioner, including the prescribing, administering, packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery; “dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses;

“distribute” means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance, whether or not there is any money or other item of value exchanged; it includes sale, gift, or exchange; “distributor” means a person who distributes;

“drug”

means

a substance recognized as a drug in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National Formulary, or any supplement to these publications;

a substance intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or animals;

a substance, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or animals; and

a substance intended for use as a component of any article specified in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this subparagraph;

does not include a device or its components, parts, or accessories;

“hashish” means the dried, compressed, resinous product of the plant (genus) Cannabis;

“hashish oil” means the viscous liquid concentrate of tetrahydrocannabinols extracted from the plant (genus) Cannabis, but does not include cannabidiol oil;

“immediate precursor” means a substance which is by statute or regulation designated as the principal compound commonly used or produced primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance, the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit manufacture of that controlled substance;

“manufacture”

means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, growing, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis; however, the growing of marijuana for personal use is not manufacturing;

includes the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance or its container unless done in conformity with applicable federal law

by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner’s administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner’s professional practice; or

by a practitioner, or by the practitioner’s authorized agent under the practitioner’s supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale;

“marijuana” means the seeds, and leaves, buds, and flowers of the plant (genus) Cannabis, whether growing or not; it does not include the resin or oil extracted from any part of the plants, or any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation from the resin or oil, including hashish, hashish oil, and natural or synthetic tetrahydrocannabinol; it does not include the stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the stalks, fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant that is incapable of germination; it does not include industrial hemp as defined in AS

03.05.100

;

“opiate” means

a substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining capability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining capability; and

includes its racemic and levorotatory forms; but

does not include the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan);

“opium poppy” means the plant of any species of Papaver containing the phenanthrine alkaloids of opium, except its seeds;

“peyote” means any part of the plant classified botanically as Lophophora Williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds of the plant, any extract from any part of the plant, and a compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or extracts, including mescaline;

“poppy straw” means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing;

“practitioner” means

a physician, dentist, advanced practice registered nurse, optometrist, veterinarian, scientific investigator, or other person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, or to administer or use in teaching or chemical analysis a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in the state;

a pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in the state;

“recreation or youth center” means a building, structure, athletic playing field, or playground

run or created by a municipality or the state to provide athletic, recreational, or leisure activities for minors; or

operated by a public or private organization licensed to provide shelter, training, or guidance for minors;

“sale” means to sell, barter, exchange, give, or dispose of to another, or an exchange for a thing of value;

“schedule IA controlled substance” means a controlled substance included in the schedule in AS

11.71.140

;

“schedule IIA controlled substance” means a controlled substance included in the schedule in AS

11.71.150

;

“schedule IIIA controlled substance” means a controlled substance included in the schedule in AS

11.71.160

;

“schedule IVA controlled substance” means a controlled substance included in the schedule in AS

11.71.170

;

“schedule VA controlled substance” means a controlled substance included in the schedule in AS

11.71.180

;

“schedule VIA controlled substance” means a controlled substance included in the schedule in AS

11.71.190

;

“school bus” means a motor vehicle operated by a school district or private school, directly or by contract, to transport students;

“school grounds” means a building, structure, athletic playing field, playground, parking area, or land contained within the real property boundary line of a public or private preschool, elementary, or secondary school;

“substance” means a drug, controlled substance, or immediate precursor included in the schedules set out in AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

or in an emergency regulation adopted under AS

11.71.125

, AS

44.62.250

, and

44.62.260

;

“ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the person’s own use or for the use of a member of the person’s household or for administering to an animal owned by the person or by a member of the person’s household.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 41 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 70 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 2005; am § 34 ch 2 SSSLA 2017; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 5 SLA 2018; am §§ 6, 7 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs in this section were renumbered in 1991, 1994, and 2018 as necessary to reflect the enactment of paragraphs (3), (21), and (30) — (32) and maintain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, in (19)(A), inserted “advanced practice registered nurse, optometrist,” following “a physician, dentist,”.

The first 2018 amendment, effective April 13, 2018, added “, but does not include cannabidiol oil” at the end of (11) [now (12)]; in (14) [now (15)], added “; it does not include industrial hemp as defined in AS

03.05.100

” at the end, and made a stylistic change; added (31) [now (3)].

The second 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, in (4) [now (5)], added “or included in those schedules by an emergency regulation adopted under AS

11.71.125

” at the end; added (31).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5,
ch. 66, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendment of the definition of “recreation or youth center” “applies to acts committed on or after July 14, 2005.”